Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1280.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 17-253, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE17-253. Mexican gray wolf; memorandum of understanding; reporting A. The commission shall attempt to enter into a memorandum of understanding with the United States fish and wildlife service regarding the endangered species act and the release, translocation and cross-fostering of Mexican gray wolves prior to any release, translocation or cross-fostering in this state.  The memorandum of understanding shall specify that a Mexican gray wolf release, translocation or cross-fostering may not occur: 1. Within three miles of state trust land or private property. 2. Without a full DNA profile on each Mexican gray wolf that is released, translocated or cross-fostered. B. The department shall report to the commission at every commission meeting the following information: 1. Any known death of a Mexican gray wolf in this state and, if known, the reason for the death. 2. The number of Mexican gray wolves that are supplemented with feed in this state and the cost of the supplementation. 3. The number of Mexican gray wolves that are captured in this state by the department or a federal agency partnering with the department, the reason for the capture and the full DNA profile on each Mexican gray wolf captured. 4. The location of all collared Mexican gray wolves in this state. 5. All human and domestic animal incidents in this state that involve a Mexican gray wolf. C. Notwithstanding any other law, the commission may not do either of the following: 1. Transport mexican gray wolf puppies into the boundaries of this state. 2. Spend public monies or use public resources for the transportation of mexican gray wolf puppies into the boundaries of this state. END_STATUTE